Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1354, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 66, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 1354), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1354. There is hereby re-created, to continue until


July 1, 2025 2026, pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset


Law, the State Board of Examiners of Psychologists. The Board shall


administer the provisions of the Psychologists Licensing Act. The


Board shall consist of seven (7) members appointed by the Governor.


Five members shall be psychologists from various areas in psychology


and two members shall be lay persons. At the expiration of the term


of each Board member who is a psychologist, the Governor shall


appoint a successor from a list of ten licensed psychologists which

Req. No. 10608 Page 1


is provided by the Oklahoma State Psychological Association.


Members shall serve for a term of four (4) years and until a


successor is appointed and qualified. Before entering upon the


duties of office, each member of the Board shall take the


constitutional oath of office and file it with the Secretary of


State.




60-1-10608 SW 12/04/24

































Req. No. 10608 Page 2